Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.030

Unlawful practices of handlers.

It shall be unlawful for any handler to engage, or permit any employee or agent to engage, in the following practices:

(1) To refuse to negotiate with an association of producers accredited under RCW 15.83.020 with respect to any qualified commodity: PROVIDED, That the obligation to negotiate does not require either party to agree to a proposal, to make a concession, or to enter into a contract;

(2) To coerce any producer in the exercise of his or her right to contract with, join, refrain from contracting with or joining, belong to an association of producers, or refuse to deal with any producer because of the exercise of that producer's right to contract with, join, or belong to an association or because of that producer's promotion of legislation on behalf of an association of producers;

(3) To discriminate against any producer with respect to price, quantity, quality, or other terms of purchase, acquisition, or other handling of agricultural products because of that producer's membership in or contract with an association of producers or because of that producer's promotion of legislation on behalf of an association of producers;

(4) To coerce or intimidate any producer to enter into, maintain, breach, cancel, or terminate a membership agreement or marketing contract with an association of producers or a contract with a handler;

(5) To pay or loan money, give anything of value, or offer any other inducement or reward to a producer for refusing or ceasing to belong to an association of producers;

(6) To make knowingly false reports about the finances, management, or activities of associations of producers or handlers;

(7) To conspire, agree, or arrange with any other person to do, aid, or abet any act made unlawful by this chapter; or

(8) To refuse, in the event that an acceptable price cannot be agreed to between a producer and a processor, to meet with a mutually agreed upon third-party mediator to resolve the price dispute. Any fees associated with the third-party mediation must be borne by the producer.

[ 2020 c 176 s 3; 1989 c 355 s 4.]